Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2627
Pesticide Administrative Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Pesticide Administrative Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund shall be used by the department to aid in defraying the expenses of administering the act. Any money in the Pesticide Administrative Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 329, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 874, § 4.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.